Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB782.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Institution" or "postsecondary education institution" means a university,
college, community college, health technology center, vocational-technical
school, technical institute, technical college, technology center, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(b) "Student experiencing homelessness" or "homeless student":
1. Means an individual enrolled in an institution:
a. Who lacks or is at imminent risk of lacking a fixed, regular, and
adequate nighttime residence; or
b. Who is a minor and whose parent or legal guardian is unable or
unwilling to provide shelter and care; and
2. Includes a homeless individual as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 11302.
As used in this paragraph, "fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence" does not include residence in an institution's on-campus
housing; and
(c) "Student in care" means a student enrolled in an institution and:
(a) The student's family receives state-funded adoption assistance under
KRS 199.555;
(b) The student is currently committed to the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services and placed in a family foster home or placed in
accordance with KRS 605.090(3);
(c) The student is in an independent living program and the placement is
funded by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/15/2026 2:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 472
(d) The student is an adopted child who was in the permanent legal
custody of and placed for adoption by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services; or
(e) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services was the student's legal
custodian on his or her eighteenth birthday.
(2) (a) In an effort to provide assistance to students experiencing homelessness and
students in care, each postsecondary education institution shall designate at
least one (1) staff member who, in addition to his or her usual employment
responsibilities, shall serve as a liaison to assist homeless students and
students in care enrolled at the institution.
(b) The liaison designated under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall offer
assistance and resources to any homeless student or student in care enrolled
at the institution. The liaison shall have the following duties:
1. To understand provisions pertaining to the financial aid eligibility of
homeless students, including eligibility as an independent student
under the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-329;
2. To identify services and resources that are available to and
appropriate for a homeless student;
3. To assist a homeless student or student in care in applying for and
receiving federal and state financial aid and available services;
4. To track and monitor the graduation rate and retention rate of
homeless students and students in care enrolled at the institution;
5. To report annually to the Council on Postsecondary Education by
August 1, as appropriate, the number of homeless students and
students in care enrolled at the institution, as well as the graduation
rate and retention rate of these students. The report shall also include
the number of students who received assistance or services through
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/15/2026 2:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 472
the liaison and the type of service or assistance received by the student.
If the information is available, the report may describe the outcome
for the student as a result of the services or assistance he or she
received through the liaison;
6. To act as an intermediary between a homeless student or student in
care and the office of financial aid, student support services, and
campus housing services;
7. To connect a homeless student or student in care to a local continuum
of care program;
8. To publish on the institution's website information about the services
and resources available through the institution's liaison, as well as
contact information for local, state, and federal services;
9. To develop a plan to provide access to on-campus housing or to
suitable off-campus housing between academic breaks to homeless
students or students in care enrolled at the institution; and
10. To train the institution's employees to identify students experiencing
homelessness and to refer those students to the liaison. At his or her
discretion, the liaison may provide any additional service he or she
reasonably believes is within the purview of the role of liaison.
(c) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall adopt policies and
procedures to implement and administer this section. The council policies
and procedures shall:
1. Provide access to a training program for the liaisons and other
relevant postsecondary institution employees developed by a homeless
advocacy organization;
2. Require each postsecondary education institution's liaison to receive
training on an annual basis;
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/15/2026 2:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 472
3. Collaborate with the state coordinator for McKinney-Vento Homeless
Education and the contact liaisons designated under 42 U.S.C. sec.
11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) to facilitate the efficient transition of homeless
students from secondary to postsecondary education and provide
homeless students and students in care information about:
a. Support services, including financial aid, on-campus and off-
campus housing, food and meal plan programs, and counseling
services; and
b. Other resources and any other relevant information to assist
these students; and
4. Issue an annual report by September 1 of each year to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint
Committee on Education about students experiencing homelessness
and students in care enrolled at postsecondary education institutions.
(d) After three (3) academic years of data is collected or during any three (3)
consecutive academic years, if the data submitted to the council indicates
that the number of students experiencing homelessness combined with the
number of students in care averages two percent (2%) or more of the
student body enrollment of the institution, the institution shall designate an
existing employee or create a new position whose primary employment
responsibility is to carry out the duties of a liaison as described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(e) Each institution that provides on-campus housing for students enrolled at
the institution shall:
1. Grant priority for on-campus housing to students experiencing
homelessness and students in care who are enrolled at the institution,
including but not limited to access to on-campus housing that remains
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/15/2026 2:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 472
open during academic breaks, and waive housing-related fees for the
on-campus housing during academic breaks;
2. Allow students experiencing homelessness and students in care who
are enrolled part-time at the institution to access on-campus housing
during their periods of enrollment;
3. Provide information about the availability of on-campus housing to
students experiencing homelessness and students in care; and
4. Provide information about the services and assistance offered by the
institution regarding homelessness in financial aid packets, admission
packets, and on the institution's website.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/15/2026 2:11 PM Jacketed